Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3907
Counsel; right to consult with accused privately.

Any public defender, assistant public defender, or other attorney representing an indigent felony defendant who is incarcerated by law enforcement officers or other government officials without bond or in lieu of bond shall have full access to and the right to consult privately with such defendant at all reasonable hours.

Laws 1972, LB 1463, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 29-1804.09;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 25.